District of Columbia statutes.
16-1364

Force and effect of judgment; payment.

A final judgment rendered against the United States pursuant to this subchapter has like force and effect as a money judgment rendered against the United States by the Court of Claims in a suit in respect of which the United States has expressly consented to be sued. The amount of the final judgment shall be paid out of any specific appropriation applicable to the case. If a specific appropriation does not exist, the judgment shall be paid in the same manner (except with respect to interest) as judgments rendered by the Court of Claims in cases under its general jurisdiction.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 580, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-1364.
1973 Ed., § 16-1364.